Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
ABANDONED VESSELS ON PUBLIC AND

PRIVATE
PROPERTY GENERALLY

Note

L 2012, c 146, §12,
with respect to amendments to this part, provides:

"SECTION 12. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2012;
provided that county responsibility under this Act for each county shall
commence:

(1) Upon a county's
access to vessel registration and marine document records of the department of land
and natural resources or the United States Coast Guard as required in section
200-41, Hawaii Revised Statutes, in section 1 of this Act; or

(2) On January
1, 2013;

whichever is earlier".

§200-41 Disposition of certain abandoned
vessels. (a) Any vessel may be deemed abandoned if the vessel has been
moored or otherwise left in the waters of the State or on public property
contrary to law or rules having the force and effect of law, or left on private
property without authorization of the owner or occupant of the property if:

(1) The vessel's registration certificate or marine
document has expired and the registered owner no longer resides at the address
listed in the vessel registration or marine document records of the department
or the United States Coast Guard;

(2) The last registered owner of record disclaims
ownership and the current owner's name or address cannot be determined;

(3) The vessel identification numbers and other means
of identification have been removed so as to hinder or nullify efforts to
locate or identify the owner;

(4) The vessel registration records of the department
of land and natural resources and the marine document records of the United
States Coast Guard contain no record that the vessel has ever been registered
or documented and the owner's name or address cannot be determined; or

(5) The requirements of section 200-52 are met.

(b) The determination whether a vessel is
abandoned on public property may be made by:

(1) The chairperson, with regard to public property
under the jurisdiction of the department of land and natural resources; or

(2) Any other state department or agency through its
director, with regard to public property within the department or agency's
respective jurisdiction; or

(3) Any county through its mayor or the mayor's
designee, or chief of police, with regard to public property within the
respective county's jurisdiction; provided that the department shall provide to
the respective county access to the department's vessel registration and marine
document records or those of the United States Coast Guard for the purposes of
this section.

Once a vessel is deemed abandoned, the appropriate
official under this subsection may direct and cause the vessel to be taken into
custody and disposed of pursuant to and in the manner provided in this chapter.

(c) All vessels abandoned on private property
shall be the responsibility of the private property owner. [L 1991, c 272, pt
of §2; am L 2012, c 146, §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next